es: Ingredientes alimentarios para ganado: Cebada; Maíz; Avena; Harina de soja; Trigo; Otros
ja: 家畜用飼料の原材料: 大麦; コーン; オーツ麦; 大豆粕; 小麦; その他
zh-CN: 畜牧食品原料: 大麦; 玉米; 燕麦; 豆粕; 小麦; 其他
sk-SK: Zložky krmiva pre hospodárske zvieratá: Jačmeň; Kukurica; Ovos; Sójová múčka; Pšenica; Iné
nb: Ingredienser for husdyrmat: Bygg; Mais; Havre; Soyabønnemåltid; Hvete; Annet
da: Husdyrfoderingredienser: Byg; Majs; Havre; Sojabønnemel; Hvede; Andet
nl: Ingrediënten veevoer: Gerst; Mais; Haver; Sojameel; Tarwe; Andere
tr: Hayvancılık gıda maddeleri: Arpa; Mısır; Yulaflar; Soya küspesi; Buğday; Diğer
cs: Složky krmiva pro hospodářská zvířata: Ječmen; Kukuřice; Oves; Sojová mouka; Pšenice; Jiné
vi: Nguyên liệu thức ăn chăn nuôi: Lúa mạch; Ngô; Yến mạch; Bã đậu nành; Lúa mì; Khác
fr: Ingrédients alimentaires pour le bétail: Orge; Maïs; Avoine; Tourteau de soja; Blé; Autre
sv: Ingredienser för djurfoder: Korn; Majs; Havre; Sojamjöl; Vete; Övrigt
zh-TW: 畜牧食品原料: 大麥; 玉米; 燕麥; 豆粕; 小麥; 其他
pt-BR: Ingredientes alimentares para gado: Cevada; Milho; Aveia; Farinha de soja; Trigo; Outro
ro-RO: Ingrediente pentru hrana animalelor: Orz; Porumb; Ovăz; Făină de soia; Grâu; Altele
pt-PT: Ingredientes de ração animal: Cevada; Milho; Aveia; Farinha de soja; Trigo; Outro
hr-HR: Sastojci stočne hrane: Ječam; Kukuruz; Zob; Sojina kaša; Pšenica; Ostalo
pl: Składniki żywności dla zwierząt gospodarskich: Jęczmień; Kukurydza; Owies; Mączka sojowa; Pszenica; Inne
sl-SI: Sestavine krme za živino: Ječmen; Koruza; Oves; Sojina moka; Pšenica; Drugo
bg-BG: Съставки на храните за птици: Ечемик; Царевица; Овес; Соев шрот; Пшеница; Други
it: Ingredienti degli alimenti per il bestiame: Orzo; Mais; Avena; Farina di soia; Grano; Altro
de: Zutaten des Viehfutters: Gerste; Mais; Hafer; Sojaschrot; Weizen; Sonstiges
ru: Ингредиенты кормов для скота: Ячмень; Кукуруза; Овес; Соевый шрот; Пшеница; Другое
en: Livestock food ingredients: Barley; Corn; Oats; Soybean meal; Wheat; Other
el: Συστατικά ζωοτροφών: Κριθάρι; Καλαμπόκι; Βρώμη; Σογιάλευρο; Σιτάρι; Άλλο
hu: Állati takarmány összetevői: Árpa; Gabonafélék; Zab; Szójaliszt; Búza; Egyéb
lt-LT: Pašaro sudėtis: Miežiai; Kukurūzai; Avižos; Sojų lesalas; Kviečiai; Kita
ko: 축산식품 재료: 보리; 옥수수; 귀리; 대두박; 위트; 기타
fi: Karjan ruoan ainesosat: Ohra; Maissi; Kaura; Soijajauho; Vehnä; Muu
th: ส่วนผสมอาหารปศุสัตว์: ข้าวบาร์เลย์; ข้าวโพด; ข้าวโอ๊ต; กากถั่วเหลือง; ข้าวสาลี; อื่นๆ